Tennessee, session 114, SB1042.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-50-302(d), is amended by
deleting subdivision (1) and substituting:
(1) The applicant is at least twenty-one (21) years of age;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-50-302, is amended by deleting
subsection (e).
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1042
001236
- 1 -